Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB443.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1102(b) and 1102.1(c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1102. Sentence for murder, murder of unborn child and murder of law enforcement officer.* * *(b) Second degree.--Except as provided under section 1102.1, a person who has been convicted of murder of the second degree, of second degree murder of an unborn child or of second degree murder of a law enforcement officer shall be sentenced to a term of [life] imprisonment of not more than 50 years.1234567891011121314151617181920 * * *§ 1102.1. Sentence of persons under the age of 18 for murder, murder of an unborn child and murder of a law enforcement officer.* * *(c) Second degree murder.--A person who has been convicted after June 24, 2012, of a murder of the second degree, second degree murder of an unborn child or murder of a law enforcement officer of the second degree and who was under the age of 18 at the time of the commission of the offense shall be sentenced as follows:(1) A person who at the time of the commission of the offense was 15 years of age or older shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment [the minimum of which shall be at least 30 years to life] of not more than 40 years.(2) A person who at the time of the commission of the offense was under 15 years of age shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment [the minimum of which shall be at least 20 years to life] of not more than 30 years.* * *Section 2. Section 6137(a)(1) and (3) of Title 61 are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6137. Parole power.(a) General criteria for parole.--(1) The board may parole subject to consideration of guidelines established under 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154.5 (relating to adoption of guidelines for parole) or subject to section 6137.1 (relating to short sentence parole) and such information developed by or furnished to the board under 20250HB0443PN0421 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 6174 (relating to right of access to offenders), or both, and may release on parole any offender to whom the power to parole is granted to the board by this chapter, except an offender condemned to death or serving life imprisonment for a conviction under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502(a) (relating to murder), whenever in its opinion:(i) The best interests of the offender justify or require that the offender be paroled.(ii) It does not appear that the interests of the Commonwealth will be injured by the offender's parole.* * *(3) The power to parole granted under this section to the board may not be exercised in the board's discretion at any time before, but only after, the expiration of the minimum term of imprisonment fixed by the court in its sentence or by the Board of Pardons in a sentence which has been reduced by commutation[.], except as follows:(i) Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 9757 (relating to consecutive sentences of total confinement for multiple offenses), the board may grant parole 25 years after the date of incarceration for an offender sentenced to life imprisonment under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102(b) (relating to sentence for murder, murder of unborn child and murder of law enforcement officer).(ii) Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 9757, the board may grant parole 20 years after the date of incarceration for an offender sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.1(c)(1) (relating to sentence of persons under the age of 18 for murder, murder of an unborn child and murder of a law enforcement officer).20250HB0443PN0421 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 9757, the board may grant parole 15 years after the date of incarceration for an offender sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.1(c)(2).(iv) Before parole may be granted under subparagraph (i), (ii) or (iii), the board must give primary consideration to the protection of the public and to victim safety. In addition to the considerations required under 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154.5, when determining whether to grant parole under subparagraph (i), (ii) or (iii), the board shall consider the level of culpability of the person in the underlying murder, including whether the person directly caused or intended to cause a death.* * *(3.2) The power to parole a person under paragraph (3)(i), (ii) or (iii) may only be utilized if the victims of the underlying offense have been notified that parole is being considered and are given the opportunity to be heard by the board, unless there is good cause that notice or the opportunity to be heard could not be provided. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to reduce, alter or eliminate any rights of a victim under section 201 of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act.* * *Section 3. The addition of 61 Pa.C.S. § 6137(a)(3)(i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) and (3.2) shall apply to the incarceration of an offender sentenced before, on or after the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0443PN0421 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930